Washington statutes.
RCW 18.20.400

Correction of violation/deficiency—Not included in facility report.

If during an inspection, reinspection, or complaint investigation by the department, an assisted living facility corrects a violation or deficiency that the department discovers, the department shall record and consider such violation or deficiency for purposes of the facility's compliance history, however the licensor or complaint investigator shall not include in the facility report the violation or deficiency if the violation or deficiency:

(1) Is corrected to the satisfaction of the department prior to the exit conference;

(2) Is not recurring; and

(3) Did not pose a significant risk of harm or actual harm to a resident.

For the purposes of this section, "recurring" means that the violation or deficiency was found under the same regulation or statute in one of the two most recent preceding inspections, reinspections, or complaint investigations.

[ 2012 c 10 s 29; 2004 c 144 s 4.]

NOTES:

Application—2012 c 10: See note following RCW 18.20.010.

Finding—Effective date—2004 c 144: See notes following RCW 18.20.390.